District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

38-2205

Sunset provision.

Expired. .

History

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1406, 44 DCR 7378

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-2525.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 38-2201.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 38-2201.